Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Pilot Personnel Program

18A.400.
Purpose of KRS 18A.400 to 18A.450. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.405.
Personnel Steering Committee. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 55, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.410.
Duties of Personnel Steering Committee. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.415.
Discontinuance of pilot personnel program. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.420.
Approval of pilot personnel programs. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 5, effective July 15, 1995; 1998, ch. 154, § 56, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.425.
Reports from pilot agencies and the committee. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.430.
Employment manual — Administrative regulations — Expiration of pilot program. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.435.
Employee request for transfer. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 57, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.440.
Bases for organizational units for pilot programs. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes

This section (Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 9, effective July 15, 1994) was repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.445.
Use of savings attributed to agency’s pilot personnel program — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

18A.450.
Development of pilot programs by Department of Workforce Investment or Department of Kentucky State Police. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 456, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 211, § 9, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 106, effective June 26, 2007; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.